test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kualus_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - kuálus: # 2A d -k, l > l'l
    kuálus+N+Sg+Nom: kuálus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Gen: kuál´lus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Acc: kuál´lus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Ill: [kuá'lusân, kuál´lusân]
    kuálus+N+Sg+Loc: kuál´lusist
    kuálus+N+Sg+Com: kuál´lusáin
    kuálus+N+Sg+Abe: kuál´lusttáá
    kuálus+N+Ess: [kuál´lusin, kuá'lusin]
    kuálus+N+Par: [kuál´lusid, kuá'lusid]
    kuálus+N+Pl+Nom: [kuál´luseh, kuá'luseh]
    kuálus+N+Pl+Gen: [kuál´lusij, kuá'lusij]
    kuálus+N+Pl+Acc: kuál´lusijd
    kuálus+N+Pl+Ill: kuál´lusáid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Loc: kuál´lusijn
    kuálus+N+Pl+Com: kuál´lusijguin
    kuálus+N+Pl+Abe: kuál´lusijttáá
    
    
